Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,154
Categories of loan eligibility; eligible items.

Categories of loan eligibility shall include: Secondary or tertiary treatment and appurtenances; infiltration and inflow correction; major sewer system rehabilitation; new collector sewers and appurtenances; new intercepters and appurtenances; land integral to the treatment process; correction of combined sewer overflows; and nonpoint source control systems. Loans shall be made only for eligible items within such categories. For loans made entirely from state funds, eligible items shall include, but not be limited to, the costs of engineering services and contracted construction. Eligible items shall not include the costs of water rights, land, easements, and rights-of-way, legal costs, fiscal agent's fees, operation and maintenance costs, and municipal or county administrative costs. For loans made in whole or in part from federal funds, eligible items shall be those identified pursuant to the Clean Water Act.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 623, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 43;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 27.